fi: Yritys ja teollisuus > Materiaalien käsittely > Kuljettimet: Hihnakuljettimet; Joustavat kuljettimet; Pneumaattiset kuljettimet; Rullakuljettimet; Pysty- ja yläkuljettimet
vi: Kinh doanh & Công nghiệp > Vận chuyển vật tư > Băng chuyền: Băng chuyền đai; Băng chuyền mềm; Băng tải khí nén; Băng chuyền con lăn; Băng tải dọc & trên cao
it: Commercio e industria > Movimentazione di materiali > Nastri trasportatori: Trasportatori a nastro; Trasportatori flessibili; Trasportatori pneumatici; Trasportatori a rulli; Trasportatori verticali e aerei
ja: ビジネス・産業 > 運搬 > 運搬装置: ベルトコンベヤ; フレキシブルコンベヤ; 空気コンベヤー; ローラーコンベヤ; 垂直&オーバーヘッドコンベヤー
tr: İş ve Endüstri > Malzeme Taşıma > Konveyörler: Bantlı Konveyörler; Esnek Konveyörler; Pnömatik Konveyörler; Makaralı Konveyörler; Dikey ve Kafa Üstü Konveyörler
zh-CN: 商业/工业 > 材料处理 > 输送机: 带式输送机; 伸缩输送机; 气动输送机; 滚筒输送机; 垂直和高架输送机
th: ธุรกิจและอุตสาหกรรม > การขนถ่ายวัสดุ > อุปกรณ์ลำเลียง: สายพานลำเลียง; อุปกรณ์ลำเลียงแบบยืดหยุ่น; สายพานลำเลียงแบบนิวเมติก; ลูกกลิ้งลำเลียง; สายพานลำเลียงแนวตั้งและเหนือศีรษะ
ko: 비즈니스/산업 > 자재 관리 > 컨베이어: 벨트 컨베이어; 플렉시블 컨베이어; 뉴매틱 컨베이어; 롤러 컨베이어; 수직/오버헤드 컨베이어
sv: Företag och industri > Materialhantering > Rullband: Bandtransportörer; Flexibla transportörer; Pneumatiska transportörer; Rulltransportörer; Vertikala och överliggande transportörer
fr: Entreprise et industrie > Manipulation de matériel > Convoyeurs: Convoyeurs à courroie; Convoyeurs flexibles; Convoyeurs pneumatiques; Convoyeurs à rouleaux; Convoyeurs verticaux et aériens
el: Επιχειρηματικός & βιομηχανικός εξοπλισμός > Χειρισμός υλικών > Μεταφορείς: Ταινιόδρομοι μεταφοράς; Ευέλικτοι μεταφορείς; Πνευματικοί μεταφορείς; Μεταφορείς με κυλίνδρους; Κάθετοι & εναέριοι μεταφορείς
cs: Obchod a průmysl > Manipulace s materiálem > Dopravníkové pásy: Pásové dopravníky; Flexibilní dopravníky; Pneumatické dopravníky; Válečkové dopravníky; Vertikální a stropní dopravníky
hu: Üzlet és ipar > Anyagkezelés > Szállítószalagok: Szíjas szállítószalagok; Rugalmas szállítószalagok; Pneumatikus szállítószalagok; Görgős szállítószalagok; Függőleges és felső szállítószalagok
zh-TW: 商業與各產業 > 物料處理 > 運送機: 帶式輸送機; 柔性輸送機; 氣動輸送機; 滾筒輸送機; 垂直/高架輸送機
da: Erhverv og industri > Materialehåndtering > Transportører: Båndtransportører; Fleksible transportører; Pneumatiske transportører; Rulletransportører; Lodrette og overliggende transportører
bg-BG: Бизнес и промишленост > Товаро-разтоварни операции > Транспортьори: Лентови транспортьори; Гъвкави транспортьори; Пневматични транспортьори; Ролкови транспортьори; Вертикални и горни транспортьори
lt-LT: Verslas ir pramonė > Medžiagų tvarkymas > Konvejeriai: Juostiniai konvejeriai; Lankstūs konvejeriai; Pneumatiniai konvejeriai; Ritininiai konvejeriai; Vertikalūs ir viršutiniai konvejeriai
en: Business & Industrial > Material Handling > Conveyors: Belt Conveyors; Flexible Conveyors; Pneumatic Conveyors; Roller Conveyors; Vertical & Overhead Conveyors
pl: Biznes i przemysł > Transport materiałów > Przenośniki: Przenośniki taśmowe; Przenośniki elastyczne; Przenośniki pneumatyczne; Przenośniki rolkowe; Przenośniki pionowe i podwieszone
hr-HR: Posao i industrija > Rukovanje materijalom > Transporteri: Pokretne trake; Škarasti valjkasti transporteri; Pneumatski transporteri; Valjkasti transporteri; Vertikalni i nadzemni transporteri
nb: Forretninger og industri > Materialhåndtering > Samlebånd: Beltesamlebånd; Fleksible samlebånd; Pneumatiske transportører; Rullesamlebånd; Vertikale og overliggende transportører
ru: Бизнес и промышленность > Погрузо-разгрузочные операции > Конвейеры: Ленточные конвейеры; Гибкие конвейеры; Пневматические конвейеры; Роликовые конвейеры; Вертикальные и подвесные конвейеры
de: Wirtschaft & Industrie > Materialbeförderung > Förderanlagen: Förderbänder; Flexible Förderer; Pneumatische Förderer; Rollenbahnen; Vertikal- und Hängeförderer
es: Economía e industria > Manipulación de materiales > Cintas transportadoras: Cintas transportadoras de correa; Cintas transportadoras flexibles; Transportadores neumáticos; Cintas transportadoras de rodillos; Transportadores verticales y aéreos
pt-PT: Business e industrial > Manuseamento de material > Transportadores: Correias transportadoras; Transportadores flexíveis; Transportadoras pneumáticas; Transportadores de rolo; Transportadoras verticais e aéreas
pt-BR: Comercial e industrial > Manuseio de materiais > Transportadoras: Correia transportadora; Transportadoras flexíveis; Transportadores pneumáticos; Transportadoras de rolos; Transportadores verticais e aéreos
sk-SK: Obchod a priemysel > Manipulácia s materiálom > Dopravníky: Pásové dopravníky; Flexibilné dopravníky; Pneumatické dopravníky; Valcové dopravníky; Vertikálne a stropné dopravníky
nl: Zakelijk en industrieel > Materiaalbehandeling > Transportbanden: Transportbanden met riem; Flexibele transportbanden; Pneumatische transportbanden; Rollende transportbanden; Verticale en zwevende transportbanden
ro-RO: Afaceri și sectorul industrial > Manipularea materialelor > Transportoare: Benzi transportoare; Transportoare flexibile; Transportoare pneumatice; Transportoare cu role; Transportoare verticale și aeriene
sl-SI: Posel in industrija > Manipuliranje z materialom > Transporterji: Tračni transporterji; Fleksibilni transporterji; Pnevmatski transporterji; Valjčni transporterji; Vertikalni in nadzemni transporterji